pt-PT: Certificações e normas do produto: ASC; Sem álcool; Tudo ingredientes naturais; Sem alumínio; Empresa B; Sem BPA; Biodegradável; Certificação CE; Livre de crueldade; DBP; Dermatologicamente testado; Sem corantes; Verificado pelo EWG; Ecológico; Ecocert; Aprovado pela FDA; Comércio justo; Não contém formaldeído; Não contém tolueno; GMP; GRAS; Não tem glúten; Halal; Hipoalergénico; ISO; Escolha informada; Kosher; Sem látex; Certificado Leaping Bunny; Certificado de segurança; Conselho de Proteção Marinha (MSC); NSF; Certificação Natrue; Ingredientes naturais; Sem corantes artificiais; Sem fragrância artificial; Sem OGM; Não tóxico; Sem óleo; Orgânico; Aprovado pela PETA; Sem parabenos; Sem fosfato; Sem ftalatos; Sem plástico; Seguro para grávidas; Certificação RSPO; Rainforest Alliance; Compatível com restrição de substâncias perigosas (RoHS); Proteção SPF; Pele sensível; Sem silicone; Sem sulfato; Certificado UL; Vegano; Outro
fi: Tuotesertifioinnit ja -standardit: ASC; Alkoholiton; Täysin luonnolliset ainesosat; Alumiiniton; B-yritys; BPA-vapaa; Biohajoava; CE-sertifioitu; Väkivallaton; DBP; Ihotautilääkärin testaama; Väriaineeton; EWG-varmennettu; Ympäristöystävällinen; Ecocert; FDA:n hyväksymä; Reilu kauppa; Ei sisällä formaldehydiä; Ei sisällä tolueenia; GMP; GRAS; Gluteeniton; Halal; Hypoallergeeninen; ISO; Tietoinen valinta; Kosher; Lateksiton; Leaping Bunny -sertifioitu; Made Safe -sertifioitu; Marine Stewardship Council (MSC); NSF; NATRUE-sertifioitu; Luonnolliset ainesosat; Ei keinotekoisia väriaineita; Ei keinotekoisia hajuaineita; GMO-vapaa; Myrkytön; Öljytön; Luomu; PETA:n hyväksymä; Parabeeniton; Fosfaattiton; Ftalaatiton; Muoviton; Turvallinen raskauden aikana; RSPO-sertifioitu; Rainforest Alliance; Vaarallisten aineiden rajoitusten (RoHS) mukainen; UV-suojaus; Herkkä iho; Silikoniton; Sulfaattiton; UL-sertifioitu; Vegaani; Muu
sk-SK: Certifikácie a štandardy produktov: ASC; Bez alkoholu; Iba prírodné zložky; Bez hliníka; Certifikácia B corporation; Bez BPA; Biologicky rozložiteľný; Certifikácia CE; Netestované na zvieratách; DBP; Dermatologicky testované; Bez farbív; EWG overené; Ekologický; Ecocert; Schválené FDA; Fair trade; Bez formaldehydu; Neobsahuje toluén; GMP; GRAS; Bezlepkový; Halal; Hypoalergénny; ISO; Informovaná voľba; Kóšer; Bez latexu; Certifikovaný Leaping Bunny; Certifikovaný ako bezpečný; Rada pre správu morí (MSC); NSF; Certifikované Natrue; Prírodné zložky; Bez umelých farbív; Bez umelých aróm; Bez GMO; Netoxický; Bez oleja; Organický; Schválené PETA; Bez parabénov; Bez fosfátov; Bez ftalátov; Bez plastov; Bezpečné pre tehotné ženy; Certifikované RSPO; Aliancia dažďových pralesov; Vyhovuje požiadavkám na obmedzovanie nebezpečných látok (RoHS); Ochrana SPF; Citlivá pokožka; Bez silikónu; Bez sulfátov; Certifikované UL; Vegánsky; Iné
nl: Productcertificeringen en -normen: ASC; Alcoholvrij; Volledig natuurlijke ingrediënten; Aluminiumvrij; B corporation; BPA-vrij; Biologisch afbreekbaar; CE-gecertificeerd; Diervriendelijk; DBP; Dermatologisch getest; Kleurstofvrij; Gecontroleerd door EWG; Milieuvriendelijk; Ecocert; FDA-goedgekeurd; Fair trade; Vrij van formaldehyde; Vrij van tolueen; GMP; GRAS; Glutenvrij; Halal; Hypoallergeen; ISO; Geïnformeerde keuze; Koosjer; Latexvrij; Leaping bunny gecertificeerd; Made safe-gecertificeerd; Marine Stewardship Council (MSC); NSF; Natrue-gecertificeerd; Natuurlijke ingrediënten; Geen kunstmatige kleuren; Geen kunstmatige geur; Non-GMO; Niet-giftig; Olievrij; Biologisch; Goedgekeurd door PETA; Parabeenvrij; Fosfaatvrij; Ftalaatvrij; Plasticvrij; Zwangerschapsbescherming; RSPO-gecertificeerd; Rainforest alliance; Conform de RoHS-richtlijn; SPF-bescherming; Gevoelige huid; Siliconenvrij; Sulfaatvrij; UL-gecertificeerd; Vegan; Andere
ru: Сертификация и стандарты продукции: ASC; Без спирта; Только натуральные ингредиенты; Не содержит алюминия; Общественно полезная корпорация; Без BPA; Биоразлагаемый; Сертификация CE; Не тестируется на животных; DBP; Протестировано дерматологами; Без красителей; Проверено EWG; Экологичный; Ecocert; Одобрено FDA; Честная торговля; Не содержит формальдегиды; Не содержит толуол; GMP; GRAS; Без глютена; Халяль; Гипоаллергенный; ISO; Осознанный выбор; Кошерный; Без латекса; Сертификация Leaping Bunny; Сертификация Made Safe; Морской попечительский совет (MSC); NSF; Сертификация Natrue; Натуральные ингредиенты; Без искусственных красителей; Без искусственных отдушек; Без ГМО; Нетоксичный; Без масла; Органический; Одобрено PETA; Без парабенов; Без фосфатов; Без фталатов; Без пластика; Безопасно для беременных; Сертификация RSPO; Rainforest alliance; Соответствует директиве об ограничении содержания опасных веществ (RoHS); SPF-защита; Чувствительная кожа; Не содержит силиконов; Без сульфатов; Сертификация UL; Веганский; Другое
it: Certificazioni e standard di prodotto: ASC; Senza alcol; Solo ingredienti naturali; Senza alluminio; B corporation; Senza BPA; Biodegradabile; Certificato CE; Cruelty-free; DBP; Dermatologicamente testato; Senza coloranti; Controllato da EWG; Ecologico; Ecocert; Approvato dall’FDA; Commercio equo e solidale; Senza formaldeide; Senza toluene; GMP; GRAS; Senza glutine; Halal; Ipoallergenico; ISO; Scelta informata; Kosher; Senza lattice; Certificato Leaping Bunny; Certificato di sicurezza; Marine stewardship council (MSC); NSF; Certificato Natrue; Ingredienti naturali; Senza coloranti artificiali; Senza fragranze artificiali; Senza OGM; Non tossico; Senza olio; Biologico; Approvato dalla PETA; Senza parabeni; Senza fosfati; Senza ftalati; Senza plastica; Adatto all’utilizzo in gravidanza; Certificato RSPO; Rainforest Alliance; Conforme alla restrizione delle sostanze pericolose (RoHS); Protezione SPF; Pelle sensibile; Senza siliconi; Senza solfati; Certificato UL; Vegan; Altro
nb: Produktsertifiseringer og standarder: ASC; Alkoholfri; Helt naturlige ingredienser; Aluminiumsfri; B-selskap; BPA-fri; Biologisk nedbrytbar; CE-sertifisert; Dyrevennlig; DBP; Hudlegetestet; Fargefri; EWG-verifisert; Miljøvennlig; Økocert; FDA-godkjent; Rettferdig handel; Fri for formaldehyd; Fri for toluen; GMP; GRAS; Glutenfri; Halal; Hypoallergenisk; ISO; Informert valg; Kosher; Uten lateks; Leaping bunny-sertifisert; Made safe-sertifisert; Marine Stewardship Council (MSC); NSF; Natrue-sertifisert; Naturlige ingredienser; Ingen kunstige farger; Ingen kunstig duft; Ikke-GMO; Ikke-giftig; Oljefri; Økologisk; PETA-godkjent; Uten parabener; Fosfatfri; Ftalatfri; Plastfri; Graviditetsfri; RSPO-sertifisert; Regnskogalliansen; Begrensning av farlige stoffer (RoHS) kompatibel; SPF-beskyttelse; Sensitiv hud; Silikonfri; Sulfatfri; UL-sertifisert; Vegan; Annen
zh-CN: 产品认证和标准: ASC; 不含酒精; 全部天然成分; 不含铝; B 公司; 不含双酚 A; 可生物降解; CE 认证; 无残害动物实验; DBP; 经皮肤科医生测试; 无染料; EWG 认证; 环保; 生态认证; FDA 认可; 公平贸易; 无甲醛; 无甲苯; GMP; GRAS; 无麸质; 清真; 低致敏性; ISO; 知情选择; 犹太洁食; 不含乳胶; 跳跃兔子认证; 通过安全认证; 海洋管理委员会 (MSC); NSF; Natrue 认证; 天然成分; 无人工色素; 无人工香料; 非转基因; 无毒; 无油; 有机; PETA 认可; 无防腐剂; 不含磷; 不含邻苯二甲酸盐; 无塑料; 孕妇可用; RSPO 认证; 雨林联盟; 符合《有害物质限制》(RoHS) 条例; 防晒指数 SPF; 敏感肌肤; 无硅; 无硫酸盐; UL 认证; 严格素食; 其他
pt-BR: Certificações e padrões de produtos: ASC; Não contém álcool; Todos os ingredientes naturais; Sem alumínio; Corporação B; Livre de BPA; Biodegradáveis; Certificação CE; Livre de crueldade; DBP; Dermatologicamente testado; Sem corantes; Com verificação EWG; Ecológico; Ecocert; Aprovado pela FDA; Feira comercial; Sem formaldeídos; Sem tolueno; GMP; GRAS; Sem glúten; Halal; Hipoalergênico; ISO; Decisão embasada; Kosher; Sem látex; Certificado pela Leaping Bunny; Certificado pela Made Safe; Marine Stewardship Council (MSC); NSF; Certificado pela Natrue; Ingredientes naturais; Sem corantes artificiais; Sem fragrâncias artificiais; Não contém transgênicos; Não tóxico; Sem óleo; Orgânico; Aprovado pela PETA; Sem parabenos; Sem fosfato; Livre de ftalatos; Sem plástico; Testes de gravidez; Certificado pela RSPO; Rainforest Alliance; Conformidade com restrição de substâncias perigosas (RoHS); Proteção SPF; Pele sensível; Sem silicone; Livre de sulfato; Certificado pela UL; Vegano; Outro
ro-RO: Certificări și standarde de produs: ASC; Fără alcool; Numai ingrediente naturale; Fără aluminiu; Certificare B Lab; Fără BPA; Biodegradabil; Certificare CE; Fără cruzime față de animale; DBP; Testat dermatologic; Fără vopsea; Verificat EWG; Ecologic; Ecocert; Aprobare FDA; Comerț echitabil; Fără formaldehidă; Fărătoluen; GMP; GRAS; Fără gluten; Halal; Hipoalergenic; ISO; Alegere informată; Cușer; Fără latex; Certificare Leaping bunny; Certificat privind fabricarea în condiții de siguranță; Marine stewardship council (MSC); NSF; Certificare Natrue; Ingrediente naturale; Fără coloranți artificiali; Fără arome artificiale; Fără OMG; Non-toxic; Fără ulei; Organic; Aprobat PETA; Fara parabeni; Fără fosfați; Fără ftalați; Fără plastic; Sigur pentru femeile însărcinate; Certificat RSPO; Alianța pădurilor tropicale; Conform cu restricția privind substanțele periculoase (RoHS); Protecție SPF; Piele sensibilă; Fără silicon; Fără sulfați; Certificare UL; Vegan; Altele
ja: 製品認証および規格: ASC; アルコールフリー; すべて天然成分; アルミニウムフリー; Bコーポレーション; BPAフリー; 生分解性; CE認証; クルエルティフリー; DBP; 皮膚科医によるテスト済み; 染料フリー; EWG認証; 環境に優しい; エコサート; FDA承認; フェアトレード; ホルムアルデヒドフリー; トルエンフリー; GMP; GRAS; グルテンフリー; ハラール; 低刺激性; ISO; インフォームドチョイス; コーシャー; ラテックスフリー; リーピングバニー認証; Made Safe認証; 海洋管理評議会 (MSC); NSF; NATRUE認証; 天然成分; 人工着色料不使用; 人工香料不使用; Non-GMO (非遺伝子組み換え); 無毒; オイルフリー; オーガニック; FDA承認; パラベンフリー; リン酸不使用; フタル酸エステルフリー; プラスチックフリー; 妊娠中使用しても安全である; RSPO認証; レインフォレスト・アライアンス; 有害物質規制 (RoHS) 対応; SPFカット; 敏感肌; シリコーンフリー; 硫酸塩フリー; UL認定; ビーガン; その他
ko: 제품 인증 및 표준: ASC; 무알코올; 천연 성분만; 알루미늄 없음; B 법인; BPA-free; 생분해성; CE 인증; 동물 실험 반대; DBP; 피부과 테스트 완료; 무염료; EWG 인증; 친환경; 에코서트; FDA 승인; 공정무역; 포름알데히드 무첨가; 톨루엔 무첨가; GMP; GRAS; 글루텐프리; 할랄; 저자극성; ISO; 정보에 입각한 선택; 코셔; 라텍스 프리; Leaping bunny 인증; 안전 인증 획득; 해양관리협의회(MSC); NSF; 천연 인증; 천연 성분; 인공 색소 무첨가; 인공 향료 무첨가; 비GMO; 무독성; 오일 프리; 유기농; PETA 승인; 파라벤 프리; 인산염 없음; 프탈레이트 프리; 플라스틱 없음; 임신 안전; RSPO 인증; 열대우림동맹; 유해 물질 제한(RoHS) 준수; SPF 차단; 민감성 피부; 실리콘 프리; 무황산염; UL 인증; 비건; 기타
cs: Certifikace a standardy produktu: ASC; Bez alkoholu; Všechny přírodní složky; Bez hliníku; B corporation; Bez BPA; Biologicky rozložitelné; Certifikát CE; Cruelty-free; DBP; Dermatologicky testováno; Bez barviv; Ověřeno EWG; Ekologicky šetrné; Ecocert; Schváleno FDA; Fair trade; Bez formaldehydu; Bez toluenu; GMP; GRAS; Bez lepku; Halal; Hypoalergenní; ISO; Informovaná volba; Košer; Bez latexu; Certifikát Leaping bunny; Certifikát Made safe; Marine stewardship council (MSC); NSF; Certifikát Natrue; Přírodní složky; Bez umělých barviv; Bez umělých vůní; Bez GMO; Netoxické; Bez oleje; Organické; Schváleno PETA; Bez parabenů; Bez fosfátů; Bez ftalátů; Bez plastů; Bezpečné pro těhotné; Certifikát RSPO; Rainforest alliance; Splňuje požadavky na omezení nebezpečných látek (RoHS); Ochrana SPF; Citlivá pleť; Bez silikonu; Bez sulfátů; Certifikát UL; Veganské; Jiné
pl: Certyfikaty i standardy produktu: ASC; Bezalkoholowy; Wszystkie - naturalne składniki; Bez aluminium; B corporation; Bez BPA; Biodegradowalny; Posiada certyfikat CE; Nietestowany na zwierzętach; DBP; Przebadano dermatologicznie; Bezbarwny; Zweryfikowano w EWG; Przyjazny dla środowiska; Ecocert; Zatwierdzone przez FDA; Sprawiedliwy handel; Nie zawiera formaldehydu; Nie zawiera toluenu; GMP; GRAS; Bezglutenowy; Halal; Hipoalergiczny; ISO; Świadomy wybór; Koszerna; Nie zawiera lateksu; Certyfikat Leaping Bunny; Certyfikat bezpieczeństwa; Rada Zarządzania Zasobami Morskimi (MSC); NSF; Certyfikat Natrue; Naturalne składniki; Bez sztucznych barwników; Brak sztucznego zapachu; Bez GMO; Nietoksyczny; Beztłuszczowy; Organiczna; Zatwierdzone przez PETA; Bez parabenów; Bez fosforanów; Bez ftalanów; Bez tworzyw sztucznych; Bezpieczna w ciąży; Certyfikat RSPO; Rainforest Alliance; Ograniczenie stosowania substancji niebezpiecznych (RoHS); Ochrona SPF; Skóra wrażliwa; Nie zawiera silikonu; Nie zawiera siarczanów; Certyfikat UL; Wegańska; Pozostałe
sv: Produktcertifieringar och -standarder: ASC; Alkoholfri; Helt naturliga ingredienser; Aluminiumfri; B-bolag; Fri från BPA; Biologiskt nedbrytbar; CE-certifierad; Plågeri-fri; DBP; Dermatologiskt testad; Färgfri; EWG-verifierad; Miljövänlig; Ecocert; FDA-godkänd; Rättvis handel; Fri från formaldehyd; Fri från toluen; GMP; GRAS; Glutenfri; Halal; Hypoallergen; ISO; Informerat val; Kosher; Latexfri; Certifierad av den hoppande kaninen; Säker tillverkning-certifiering; Marine stewardship council (MSC); NSF; Natrue-certifierad; Naturliga ingredienser; Inga konstgjorda färger; Ingen konstgjord doft; Icke-GMO; Giftfri; Oljefri; Organisk; PETA-godkänd; Utan parabener; Fosfatfri; Ftalatfri; Plastskum; Graviditetssäker; RSPO-certifierad; Regnskogsallians; Överensstämmelse med begränsning av farliga ämnen (RoHS).; SPF-skydd; Känslig hud; Silikonfri; Sulfatfri; UL-certifierad; Vegan; Annat
fr: Certifications et normes de produits: ASC; Sans alcool; Avec seulement des ingrédients naturels; Sans aluminum; B corp; Sans BPA; Biodégradable; Certifié CE; Non testé sur les animaux; PAD; Testé dermatologiquement; Sans colorant; Approuvé par l’EWG; Respectueux de l’environnement; Ecocert; Agréé FDA; Commerce équitable; Sans formaldéhyde; Sans toluène; BPF; GRAS; Sans gluten; Halal; Hypoallergénique; ISO; Choix éclairé; Kosher; Sans latex; Certifié Leaping bunny; Certifié Made safe; Marine Stewardship Council (MSC); NSF; Certifié Nature; Ingrédients naturels; Sans colorants artificiels; Sans parfums artificiels; Sans OGM; Non toxique; Sans huile; Bio; Agréé PETA; Sans paraben; Sans phosphate; Sans phtalates; Sans plastique; Sans risque pour la grossesse; Certifié RSPO; Rainforest alliance; Conforme à la restriction des substances dangereuses (RoHS); Protection SPF; Peau sensible; Sans silicone; Sans sulfate; Certifié UL; Vegan; Autre
sl-SI: Certifikati in standardi izdelkov: ASC; Brez alkohola; Vse naravne sestavine; Brez aluminija; B korporacija; Brez BPA; Biorazgradljivo; CE certificiran; Ni testirano na živalih; DBP; Dermatološko testirano; Brez barvil; EWG preverjeno; Okolju prijazno; Ecocert; Odobreno s strani FDA; Pravična trgovina; Brez formaldehida; Brez toluena; GMP; GRAS; Brez glutena; Halal; Hipoalergensko; ISO; Ozaveščena izbira; Košer; Brez lateksa; Certifikat Poskočni zajček; Certifikat Izdelano varno; Marine Stewardship Council (MSC); NSF; Certifikat Natrue; Naravne sestavine; Brez umetnih barvil; Brez umetnih arom; Brez GSO; Nestrupeno; Brez olja; Organsko; Odobreno s strani PETA; Brez parabenov; Brez fosfatov; Brez ftalatov; Brez plastike; Varno za nosečnost; RSPO certificirano; Zveza deževnih gozdov; Skladno z omejitvijo nevarnih snovi (RoHS).; ZF zaščita; Občutljiva koža; Brez silikona; Brez sulfatov; UL certificirano; Vegansko; Drugo
lt-LT: Gaminių sertifikatai ir standartai: ASC; Be alkoholio; Pagamintas tik iš natūralių ingredientų; Be aliuminio; „B Corporation“; Be BPA; Biologiškai skaidūs; CE sertifikatas; Draugiški gyvūnams; DBP; Patikrinti dermatologų; Be dažiklių; EWG patvirtinti; Ekologiški; „Ecocert“ sertifikatas; Patvirtintas FDA; Sąžininga prekyba; Be formaldehido; Be tolueno; GMP; GRAS; Be glitimo; Chalalinis; Hipoalerginis; ISO; Informuotas pasirinkimas; Košerinis; Be latekso; „Leaping Bunny“ sertifikatas; „Made Safe“ sertifikatas; Jūrų priežiūros taryba (Marine stewardship council, MSC); NSF; „Natrue“ sertifikatas; Natūralūs ingredientai; Be dirbtinių dažiklių; Be dirbtinių kvapų; Be GMO; Netoksiškas; Be aliejaus; Ekologiškas; Patvirtintas PETA; Be parabenų; Be fosfatų; Be ftalatų; Be plastiko; Saugus nėščiosioms; RSPO sertifikatas; „Rainforest Alliance“; Atitinka pavojingų medžiagų naudojimo apribojimo direktyvą (RoHS).; SPF apsauga; Jautri oda; Be silikonų; Be sulfatų; UL sertifikatas; Veganiškas; Kita
en: Product certifications & standards: ASC; Alcohol-free; All-natural ingredients; Aluminum-free; B corporation; BPA-free; Biodegradable; CE certified; Cruelty-free; DBP; Dermatologist tested; Dye-free; EWG verified; Eco-friendly; Ecocert; FDA approved; Fair trade; Free from formaldehyde; Free from toluene; GMP; GRAS; Gluten-free; Halal; Hypoallergenic; ISO; Informed choice; Kosher; Latex-free; Leaping bunny certified; Made safe certified; Marine stewardship council (MSC); NSF; Natrue certified; Natural ingredients; No artificial colors; No artificial fragrance; Non-GMO; Non-toxic; Oil-free; Organic; PETA approved; Paraben-free; Phosphate-free; Phthalate-free; Plastic-free; Pregnancy safe; RSPO certified; Rainforest alliance; Restriction of hazardous substances (RoHS) compliant; SPF protection; Sensitive skin; Silicone-free; Sulfate-free; UL certified; Vegan; Other
de: Produktzertifizierungen und -normen: ASC; Alkoholfrei; Rein natürliche Inhaltsstoffe; Aluminiumfrei; B Corporation; BPA-frei; Biologisch abbaubar; CE-zertifiziert; Ohne Tierversuche; DBP; Dermatologisch getestet; Farbstofffrei; EWG-verifiziert; Umweltfreundlich; Ecocert; FDA-zugelassen; Fair Trade; Formaldehydfrei; Toluolfrei; GMP; GRAS; Glutenfrei; Halal; Hypoallergen; ISO; Informed choice; Koscher; Latexfrei; Leaping Bunny-zertifiziert; Made Safe-zertifiziert; Marine Stewardship Council (MSC); NSF; Natrue-zertifiziert; Natürliche Inhaltsstoffe; Keine künstlichen Farbstoffe; Keine künstlichen Duftstoffe; Nicht gentechnisch verändert; Ungiftig; Ölfrei; Bio; Von PETA befürwortet; Frei von Parabenen; Phosphatfrei; Phthalatfrei; Plastikfrei; Sicher in der Schwangerschaft; RSPO-zertifiziert; Rainforest Alliance; Konform mit den RoHS-Richtlinien (Restriction of Hazardous Substances); SPF-Schutz; Empfindliche Haut; Silikonfrei; Ohne Sulfate; UL-zertifiziert; Vegan; Sonstiges
hu: Termékre vonatkozó tanúsítványok és szabványok: ASC; Alkoholmentes; Csak természetes összetevők; Alumíniummentes; B Corporation; BPA-mentes; Biológiailag lebomló; CE-tanúsítvány; Állatokon nem tesztelt; DBP; Bőrgyógyászok által tesztelt; Színezékmentes; EWG által tanúsított; Környezetbarát; Ecocert; FDA által jóváhagyott; Tisztességes kereskedelem; Formaldehidtől mentes; Toluoltól mentes; GMP; GRAS; Gluténmentes; Halal; Hipoallergén; ISO; Megalapozott választás; Kóser; Latexmentes; „Leaping Bunny” minősítéssel; Biztonsági tanúsítvánnyal készült; Marine Stewardship Council (MSC); NSF; Natrue minősítéssel; Természetes összetevők; Nincsenek mesterséges színezékek; Nincsenek mesterséges illatanyagok; Nem génmódosított; Nem mérgező; Olajmentes; Organikus; PETA által jóváhagyott; Parabénmentes; Foszfátmentes; Ftalátmentes; Műanyagmentes; Terhességre nem veszélyes; RSPO-tanúsítvány; Rainforest Alliance; Megfelel a veszélyes anyagok korlátozására vonatkozó irányelvnek (RoHS); SPF-védelem; Érzékeny bőr; Szilikonmentes; Szulfátmentes; UL-tanúsítvány; Vegán; Egyéb
vi: Chứng nhận & tiêu chuẩn sản phẩm: ASC; Không cồn; Thành phần hoàn toàn tự nhiên; Không có nhôm; Tập đoàn B; Không chứa BPA; Phân hủy sinh học; Chứng nhận CE; Không thử nghiệm trên động vật; DBP; Đã thử nghiệm da liễu; Không có thuốc nhuộm; EWG đã xác minh; Thân thiện với môi trường; Chứng nhận Ecocert; FDA đã phê duyệt; Thương mại công bằng; Không chứa formaldehyde; Không chứa toluen; GMP; GRAS; Không chứa gluten; Halal; Không làm dị ứng; ISO; Lựa chọn sáng suốt; Kosher; Không chứa latex; Chứng nhận Leaping Bunny; Chứng nhận Made Safe; Tiêu chuẩn Marine Stewardship Council (MSC); NSF; Chứng nhận Natrue; Thành phần tự nhiên; Không có màu nhân tạo; Không có hương thơm nhân tạo; Không biến đổi gen; Không độc hại; Không dầu; Hữu cơ; PETA đã phê duyệt; Không chứa paraben; Không chứa phốt phát; Không chứa phthalate; Không có nhựa; An toàn cho người mang thai; Chứng nhận RSPO; Tiêu chuẩn Rainforest Alliance; Tuân thủ hạn chế về các chất độc hại (RoHS); Chống nắng; Làn da nhạy cảm; Không chứa silicon; Không chứa sunfate; Chứng nhận UL; Vegan; Khác
el: Πιστοποιήσεις και πρότυπα προϊόντος: ASC; Χωρίς αλκοόλ; Μόνο φυσικά συστατικά; Χωρίς αλουμίνιο; B corporation; Χωρίς BPA; Βιοδιασπώμενο; Πιστοποιημένο κατά CE; Φιλικό προς τα ζώα; DBP; Δερματολογικά ελεγμένο; Χωρίς χρωστικές; Πιστοποιημένο από το EWG; Φιλικό προς το περιβάλλον; Ecocert; Εγκεκριμένο από τον FDA; Δίκαιου εμπορίου; Χωρίς φορμαλδεΰδη; Χωρίς τολουόλη; GMP; GRAS; Χωρίς γλουτένη; Χαλάλ; Υποαλλεργικό; ISO; Συνειδητή επιλογή; Κόσερ; Χωρίς λάτεξ; Πιστοποίηση Leaping Bunny; Πιστοποίηση Made Safe; Συμβούλιο Επιστασίας των Θαλασσών (Marine Stewardship Council - MSC); NSF; Πιστοποίηση Natrue; Φυσικά συστατικά; Χωρίς τεχνητές χρωστικές; Χωρίς τεχνητό άρωμα; Χωρίς ΓΤΟ; Μη τοξικό; Χωρίς έλαια; Βιολογική; Εγκεκριμένο από την PETA; Χωρίς parabens; Χωρίς φωσφορικά άλατα; Χωρίς φθαλικές ενώσεις; Χωρίς πλαστικό; Ασφαλές για την εγκυμοσύνη; Πιστοποίηση RSPO; Rainforest Alliance; Συμβατότητα με τον περιορισμό της χρήσης επικίνδυνων ουσιών (RoHS); Προστασία βάσει του συντελεστή ηλιακής προστασία (SPF); Ευαίσθητο δέρμα; Χωρίς σιλικόνη; Χωρίς θειικά άλατα; Πιστοποίηση UL; Βίγκαν; Άλλο
tr: Ürün Sertifikaları ve Standartları: ASC; Alkolsüz; Tamamen doğal malzemeler; Alüminyum içermez; B şirketi; BPA içermez; Biyoçözünür; CE sertifikalı; Hayvan deneysiz; DBP; Dermatologlar tarafından test edildi; Boyasız; EWG onaylı; Çevre dostu; Ekosertifika; FDA onaylı; Adil ticaret; Formaldehit içermez; Toluen içermez; GMP; GRAS; Glütensiz; Helal; Hipoalerjenik; ISO; Bilinçli seçim; Kaşer; Lateks içermez; Sıçrayan tavşan sertifikalı; Güvenli sertifikalı; Deniz yönetim konseyi (MSC); NSF; Natrue sertifikalı; Doğal içerik; Yapay renk içermez; Yapay koku içermez; Non-GMO; Toksik değil; Yağsız; Organik; PETA onaylı; Paraben içermez; Fosfat içermez; Fitalat içermez; Plastik içermez; Hamileler için güvenli; RSPO sertifikalı; Yağmur ormanı ittifakı; Tehlikeli maddelerle ilgili kısıtlamaya (RoHS) uygun; SPF koruması; Hassas cilt; Silikon içermez; Sülfat içermez; UL sertifikalı; Vegan; Diğer
es: Certificaciones y estándares del producto: ASC; Sin alcohol; Todos los ingredientes naturales; Sin aluminio; Corporación B; Sin BPA; Biodegradable; Certificado CE; Libre de crueldad; DBP; Probado por dermatólogos; Sin tintes; Verificado por EWG; Producto ecológico; Ecocert; Aprobado por la FDA; Precio justo; Libre de formaldehído; Libre de tolueno; GMP; GRAS; Sin gluten; Halal; Hipoalergénico; ISO; Elección informada; Kosher; Sin látex; Certificado por el conejito saltarín (Leaping Bunny); Certificado Made Safe; Consejo de Sostenibilidad Marina (MSC); NSF; Certificado por Natrue; Ingredientes naturales; Sin colorantes artificiales; Sin fragancia artificial; No transgénico (Non-GMO); No tóxico; Libre de aceite; Orgánico; Aprobado por PETA; Libre de parabeno; Sin fosfatos; Libre de ftalatos; Sin plásticos; Seguro durante el embarazo; Certificado por la RSPO; Alianza del Bosque Tropical (Rainforest Alliance); Cumple con la restricción de sustancias peligrosas (RoHS); Protección SPF; Piel sensible; Sin silicona; Sin sulfatos; Certificación UL; Vegano; Otros
zh-TW: 商品驗證/標準: ASC; 無酒精; 全天然成分; 無鋁; B 公司; 不含雙酚 A; 可生物降解; 歐洲合格認證; 零殘忍; 鄰苯二甲酸二丁酯; 皮膚科醫師測試; 無染料; EWG 驗證; 環保; 生態認證; FDA 核可; 公平貿易; 不含甲醛; 不含甲苯; GMP; GRAS; 無麩質; 清真; 低過敏性; ISO; Informed Choice; 猶太潔食; 不含乳膠; 跳躍小兔認證; Made Safe 認證; 海洋管理委員會 (MSC); NSF; 天然認證; 天然成分; 無人工色素; 無人工香料; 非基改; 無毒; 無油; 有機; PETA 核可; 無防腐劑; 無磷; 無塑化劑; 無塑膠; 懷孕安全; RSPO 認證; 雨林聯盟; 符合有害物質限制（RoHS）規定; SPF 保護; 敏感肌膚; 無矽; 無硫酸鹽; UL 認證; 素食; 其他
bg-BG: Продуктови сертификати и стандарти: ASC; Без алкохол; Изцяло натурални съставки; Без алуминий; B corporation; Без BPA; Биоразградим; Сертифициран от CE; Без жестокости над животни; DBP; Тестван от дерматолог; Без багрила; Проверен от EWG; Екологичен; Ecocert; Одобрен от FDA; Справедлива търговия; Не съдържа формалдехид; Не съдържа толуен; GMP; GRAS; Без глутен; Халал; Хипоалергенен; ISO; Информиран избор; Кошер; Без латекс; Сертифициран със скачащо зайче; Сертифициран за безопасност; Съвет за управление на морските ресурси (MSC); NSF; Сертифициран от Natrue; Естествени съставки; Без изкуствени оцветители; Без изкуствени аромати; Без ГМО; Нетоксичен; Без масло; Органичен; Одобрен от PETA; Без парабени; Без фосфати; Без фталати; Без пластмаса; Безопасен за бременността; Сертифициран по RSPO; Алианс на тропическите гори; Съответствие с изискванията за ограничаване на опасните вещества (RoHS); SPF защита; Чувствителна кожа; Без силикон; Без сулфати; Сертифициран от UL; Веган; Други
th: การรับรองและมาตรฐานผลิตภัณฑ์: มาตรฐาน ASC; ปราศจากแอลกอฮอล์; ส่วนประกอบจากธรรมชาติทั้งหมด; ปราศจากอะลูมิเนียม; ผ่านการรับรองมาตรฐาน B Corporation; ปลอดสาร BPA; ย่อยสลายได้ทางชีวภาพ; ได้รับการรับรอง CE; ปลอดการทารุณยกรรมสัตว์; มาตรฐาน DBP; ผ่านการทดสอบโดยแพทย์ผิวหนัง; ปราศจากสีย้อม; ผ่านการตรวจสอบโดย EWG; เป็นมิตรต่อสิ่งแวดล้อม; มาตรฐาน EcoCert; ได้รับการอนุมัติจากองค์การอาหารและยา; การค้าที่เป็นธรรม; ปราศจากฟอร์มาลดีไฮด์; ปราศจากโทลูอีน; มาตรฐาน GMP; มาตรฐาน GRAS; ปราศจากกลูเตน; ฮาลาล; สูตรลดการเกิดอาการแพ้; ISO; เครื่องหมาย Informed Choice; โคเชอร์; ปราศจากยางธรรมชาติ; ได้รับการรับรอง Leaping Bunny; รับรองว่าปลอดภัย; การรับรองสภาผู้ดูแลทางทะเล (MSC); มาตรฐาน NSF; ได้รับการรับรองจาก Natrue; มีส่วนประกอบจากธรรมชาติ; ไม่มีสีสังเคราะห์; ไม่มีน้ำหอมสังเคราะห์; Non-GMO; ปลอดสารพิษ; ปราศจากน้ำมัน; ออร์แกนิก; ได้รับการอนุมัติจาก PETA; ปราศจากพาราเบน; ปราศจากฟอสเฟต; ปราศจากสารพาทาเลต; ปราศจากพลาสติก; ปลอดภัยต่อสตรีมีครรภ์; ได้รับการรับรองมาตรฐาน RSPO; ได้รับการรับรองจากองค์กร Rainforest Alliance; เป็นไปตามข้อกำหนดสำหรับการควบคุมสารอันตราย (RoHS); การป้องกัน SPF; ผิวแพ้ง่าย; ปราศจากซิลิโคน; ปราศจากซัลเฟต; ได้รับการรับรอง UL; วีแกน; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Certifikati i standardi proizvoda: ASC; Bez alkohola; Potpuno prirodni sastojci; Bez aluminija; B korporacija; Bez BPA; Biorazgradivo; CE certifikat; Nije testirano na životinjama; DBP; Dermatološki testirano; Bez boja; Odobrio EWG; Ekološki prihvatljivo; Ecocert; Odobrila FDA; Pravedna trgovina; Bez formaldehida; Bez toluena; GMP; GRAS; Bez glutena; Halal; Hipoalergeno; ISO; Informirani odabir; Kosher; Bez lateksa; Odobrio Leaping Bunny; Odobrio Made Safe; Organizacija Marine Stewardship Council (MSC); NSF; Odobrio Natrue; Prirodni sastojci; Bez umjetnih bojila; Bez umjetnih mirisa; Bez GMO-a; Netoksično; Bez ulja; Organsko; Odobrila PETA; Bez parabena; Bez fosfata; Bez ftalata; Bez plastike; Sigurno za trudnice; Odobrio RSPO; Organizacija Rainforest Alliance; Sukladno ograničenju opasnih tvari (RoHS).; SPF zaštita; Osjetljiva koža; Bez silikona; Bez sulfata; Odobrio UL; Vegansko; Ostalo
da: Produktcertificeringer og standarder: ASC; Alkoholfri; Kun naturlige ingredienser; Fri for aluminium; B-selskab; BPA-fri; Biologisk nedbrydeligt; CE-certificeret; Ikke testet på dyr; DBP; Dermatologisk testet; Farvefri; EWG-verificeret; Miljøvenlig; Økocertificeret; FDA-godkendt; Fair Trade; Fri for formaldehyd; Fri for toluen; GMP; GRAS; Glutenfri; Halal; Hypoallergenisk; ISO; Oplyst valg; Kosher; Latex-fri; Leaping bunny-certificeret; Lavet sikkert certificeret; Marine stewardship council (MSC); NSF; Naturligt certificeret; Naturlige ingredienser; Ingen kunstige farver; Ingen kunstig duft; Ingen GMO; Ikke-giftig; Oliefri; Økologisk; PETA-godkendt; Parabenfri; Fosfatfri; Phthalat-fri; Plastfri; Graviditetssikker; RSPO-certificeret; Rainforest Alliance; Begrænsning af farlige stoffer (RoHS); SPF-beskyttelse; Følsom hud; Silikonefri; Sulfatfri; UL-certificeret; Vegansk; Andet